California, session 20252026, AB1635.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2770.2 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:2770.2. (a) A person shall not conduct pit dewatering in areas with subsurface river flow or groundwater levels shallower than 50 feet below ground.(b) For purposes of this section, “pit dewatering” means any water that is impounded or that collects in the pit and is pumped, drained, or otherwise removed from the pit through the efforts of the pit operator. This term also includes wet pit overflows caused solely by direct rainfall or ground water seepage.SECTION 1.Section 2710 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:2710.This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975.